Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-218.01
Inactive company; charter revoked; when; release of assets.

Any trust company which fails to exercise trust powers for three years or which voluntarily surrenders duties associated with fiduciary accounts so that no activity is reported for a period of three years, as determined by the consecutive annual reports submitted to the Department of Banking and Finance, shall be deemed inactive. Trust charters determined to be inactive as described in this section shall be revoked and the pledged assets released in accordance with section 8-215.

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 33.